Missouri, session 2026, SB1354.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 452.425, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 452.425,
to read as follows:
452.425. Any court order for the custody of, or
visitation with, a child [may] shall include a provision
that the sheriff or other law enforcement officer shall
enforce the rights of any person to custody or visitation
unless the court issues a subsequent order pursuant to
chapter 210, 211, 452 or 455 to limit or deny the custody
of, or visitations with, the child. Such sheriff or law
enforcement officer shall not remove a child from a person
who has actual physical custody of the child unless such
sheriff or officer is shown a court order or judgment which
clearly and convincingly verifies that such person is not
entitled to the actual physical custody of the child, and
there are not other exigent circumstances that would give
the sheriff or officer reasonable suspicion to believe that
the child would be harmed or that the court order presented
to the sheriff or officer may not be valid.
✓
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.